Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB380.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the China Divestiture Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Alternative investments." An investment in a private equity fund, private debt fund, venture fund, real estate fund, hedge fund or absolute return fund."Board." Any of the following:(1) The Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement Board.(2) The Public School Employees' Retirement Board.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) The State Employees' Retirement Board."China." The People's Republic of China."Company." A sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company or other entity or business association that exists for the purpose of making a profit."Direct holdings." All securities of a company or the government of China that are held directly by the public fund."Foreign company." An entity which is not organized under the laws of the United States."Government of China." The government of China and its political subdivisions and the instrumentalities and companies owned or controlled by the government of China or its political subdivisions."Indemnitee." Each current or former board member, duly appointed designee of a board member, officer, employee, including, without limitation, the attorneys in the Office of Chief Counsel that serve a public fund, agent, research firm or investment manager of a public fund who was or is a party to, or is threatened to be made a party to or is otherwise involved in, any proceeding by reason of the fact that the person is or was a board member, designee of a board member, officer, employee, agent, research firm or investment manager of a public fund."Indirect holdings." All securities held in an account or fund such as a mutual fund managed by one or more persons not employed by a public fund, in which the public fund owns shares or interests together with other investors."Public fund." Any of the following:(1) The State Employees' Retirement Fund established 20250SB0380PN0327 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. XXV (relating to retirement for State employees and officers).(2) The Public School Employees' Retirement Fund established under 24 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV (relating to retirement for school employees).(3) The Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement Fund.(4) Any Commonwealth fund of which the State Treasurer is the custodian."Sanctioned Chinese company." A foreign company sanctioned under the authority of Presidential Executive Order 14032 (June 3, 2021), published at 86 Fed. Reg. 107, 30145 (June 7, 2021)."Scrutinized company." A foreign company domiciled in or organized under the laws of China. The term includes a sanctioned Chinese company.Section 3. Identification.Within 30 days of the effective date of this section and no less frequently as deemed necessary by the State Treasurer or a board thereafter, a public fund shall make its best effort to identify all direct holdings, indirect holdings and alternative investments of scrutinized companies and the government of China.Section 4. Divestment.(a) Initial divestment of direct holdings.--A public fund shall sell, redeem, divest or withdraw from its direct holdings all securities of the government of China.(b) Additional divestment.--Beginning on the effective date of this section, a public fund shall sell, redeem, divest or withdraw from the following:(1) A scrutinized company in which the public fund has direct holdings.20250SB0380PN0327 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A scrutinized company in which the public fund has indirect holdings and alternative investments.(3) Securities of the government of China in which the public fund has indirect holdings and alternative investments.(c) Prohibition.--A public fund may not acquire direct holdings, indirect holdings or alternative investments of scrutinized companies or the government of China.(d) Deadline.--(1) All investments referenced in subsections (a) and (b) must be divested not later than the following:(i) At least 50% of the investment shall be removed from a public fund's assets within three years after the effective date of this subparagraph.(ii) At least 75% of the investment shall be removed from a public fund's assets within five years of the effective date of this subparagraph.(iii) One hundred percent of the investment shall be removed from a public fund's assets within 10 years of the effective date of this subparagraph.(2) An administrator of a public fund shall use the administrator's best efforts to liquidate the assets listed in subsection (b)(2) and (3) over unspecified periods of time in a manner that does not result in significant adverse economic harm to the public fund since these assets are invested in partnerships and other investment vehicles that make these assets illiquid and typically represent long-term public fund investment holdings.Section 5. Reporting.(a) Duty of public fund.--A public fund shall, within three 20250SB0380PN0327 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 months of the effective date of this subsection and not less than once per year thereafter, provide a report with the content under subsection (b) to the Governor, the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and each member of the boards of the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement System, the State Employees' Retirement System and the Public School Employees' Retirement System. The report shall include the items required under subsection (b). The public funds may file a joint report under this subsection. The report shall be made available to the public.(b) Contents.--The report under subsection (a) shall include all of the following:(1) A list of all scrutinized companies in which the public fund has direct holdings, indirect holdings and alternative investments.(2) All investments sold, redeemed, divested or withdrawn in compliance with section 4(a), the costs and expenses of the transfers and a determination of net gain or loss on account of the transactions incurred in compliance with the provisions of this act, which shall be determined in accordance with section 9.(3) All investments sold, redeemed, divested or withdrawn in compliance with section 4(b).(4) All prohibited investments under section 4(c).Section 6. Expiration.A public fund shall have no obligations under this act with respect to foreign companies which are domiciled in or organized under the laws of China or the government of China upon the occurrence of any of the following:(1) The company is no longer a foreign company which is 20250SB0380PN0327 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 domiciled in or organized under the laws of China.(2) The President or Congress of the United States, through executive order or legislation, declares that mandatory divestment of the type provided for in this act interferes with the conduct of United States foreign policy.Section 7. Conflict with other laws.(a) Compliance.--Except as otherwise provided under subsection (b), a public fund may perform any action necessary to comply with this act, including, but not limited to, any fiduciary or prudent investing responsibilities as prescribed in 20 Pa.C.S. § 7302 (relating to authorized investments; in general), 24 Pa.C.S. § 8521 (relating to management of fund and accounts), 71 Pa.C.S. § 5931 (relating to management of fund and accounts) and section 110 of the act of February 1, 1974 (P.L.34, No.15), known as the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement Law, and any obligations of a public fund with respect to choice of asset managers, investment funds or investments for the public fund's securities portfolios.(b) Applicable standard.--Divestment under section 4(b) shall be made in accordance with any applicable fiduciary or prudent investing responsibilities as prescribed under 20 Pa.C.S. § 7302, 24 Pa.C.S. § 8521 and 71 Pa.C.S. § 5931, section 110 of the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement Law and any obligations of a public fund with respect to choice of asset managers, investment funds or investments for the public fund's securities portfolios.Section 8. Indemnification.(a) Actions subject to indemnification.--Each indemnitee shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Commonwealth for all good faith actions taken by the indemnitee and for all good 20250SB0380PN0327 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 faith failures to take action, regardless of the date of any action or failure to take action, in connection with attempts to comply with any investment limitations imposed by statute against all expense, liability and loss, including, without limitation, attorney fees, judgments, fines, taxes, penalties and amounts paid or to be paid in settlements reasonably incurred or suffered by the indemnitee in connection with any proceeding.(b) Advance payment.--The right to indemnification provided under this section shall include the right to have the expenses reasonably incurred by the indemnitee in defending any proceeding paid by the Commonwealth in advance of the final disposition of the proceeding upon the receipt by the Commonwealth of a written undertaking by the indemnitee to refund the amounts so advanced if it is ultimately determined that the indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification under this section.(c) Persons entitled.--Indemnification under this section shall continue as to an indemnitee who has ceased to be a board member, designee of a board member, officer or employee of a public fund and shall inure to the benefit of the person's legal representatives, heirs, executors and administrators.(d) Reimbursement to public funds.--To the extent that the Commonwealth does not make any indemnification payments, including any advancement of legal fees and expenses, within 30 days of demand therefor, a public fund shall make such payment and the Commonwealth shall reimburse the public fund.(e) Construction.--The repeal, expiration or amendment of any provision of this section shall not limit the rights of any indemnitee to indemnification, including advancement of 20250SB0380PN0327 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expenses, with respect to any action or failure to act occurring prior to the effective date of a repeal or amendment.Section 9. Fund reimbursement.The Commonwealth shall reimburse each public fund for the public fund's net losses, costs and expenses incurred as a result of compliance with the provisions of this act. The reimbursements shall occur in the following manner:(1) The public fund shall submit to the Secretary of the Budget an itemization of the amount necessary to be appropriated by the General Assembly to reimburse the public fund for net losses, costs and expenses incurred as a result of compliance with the provisions of section 4(a) in the previous fiscal year. This paragraph shall only apply to net losses, costs and expenses incurred after the effective date of this paragraph and relating to a first year after sale, redemption, divestiture or withdrawal under section 4(a). To the extent the public fund experiences net gains as a result of compliance with the provisions of section 4(a) in a fiscal year, the net gains shall be used to offset any reported costs or expenses incurred by the public fund.(2) In consultation with each public fund, the Secretary of the Budget shall annually establish a uniform method for the determination of gains and losses under paragraph (1). The method shall be used by each public fund in making a claim for reimbursement under this section. The budget submission shall be on a form and in a manner determined by the Secretary of the Budget, including net losses, along with an itemized accounting of all costs and expenses claimed by the public fund. Budget submission shall occur no later than November 1 following the fiscal year in which the net losses, 20250SB0380PN0327 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 costs and expenses were incurred.(3) Upon appropriation by the General Assembly to provide for the obligations of the Commonwealth, the amount shall be paid by the State Treasurer through the Department of Revenue into the public fund within 90 days of receipt of the requisition presented by the public fund.Section 10. Nonapplicability.(a) State Employees' Defined Contribution Plan and Commonwealth's Deferred Compensation Plan.--The provisions and restrictions of this act shall not apply to the State Employees' Defined Contribution Plan established under 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. XXV (relating to retirement for State employees and officers), known as the State Employees' Retirement Code, the Commonwealth's Deferred Compensation Plan established under section VIII.2 of the act of March 30, 1811 (P.L.145, No.99), referred to as the Settlement of Public Accounts Act, or to the individual investment accounts or the funds and investments therein of the participants of the plans, but the State Employees' Retirement Board is authorized to offer to the participants of the plans investment vehicles that would be permitted under this act.(b) School Employees' Defined Contribution Plan.--The provisions and restrictions of this act shall not apply to the School Employees' Defined Contribution Plan established under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 84 (relating to School Employees' Defined Contribution Plan) or to the individual investment accounts or the funds and investments therein of the participants of the plan, but the Public School Employees' Retirement Board is authorized to offer to the participants of the plan investment vehicles that would be permitted under this act.(c) Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program, Tuition 20250SB0380PN0327 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Account Investment Program and Pennsylvania ABLE Savings Program.--The provisions and restrictions of this act shall not apply to the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program or the Tuition Account Investment Program established under the act of April 3, 1992 (P.L.28, No.11), known as the Tuition Account Programs and College Savings Bond Act or the Pennsylvania ABLE Savings Program established under the act of April 18, 2016 (P.L.128, No.17), known as the Pennsylvania ABLE Act.Section 11. Severability.If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0380PN0327 - 10 - 123456789101112131415